District of Columbia statutes.
38-2551

Establishment.

There is established a Special Education Task Force (“Task Force”) with the purpose of serving as a collaborative body of District agencies that will monitor, support, and implement special education reform within the District of Columbia Public Schools.

History

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 372, 50 DCR 5668

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-192.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Special Education Task Force Establishment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-232, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10729).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle H of title III of Law 15-39: Section 371 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that subtitle H of title III of the act may be cited as the Special Education Task Force Establishment Act of 2003.